New York, session 2025-2026, S4275.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2833 to read as follows: 3 § 2833. Closure of nursing homes. 1. In the event that an operator of 4 a nursing home elects to close the facility, the following shall apply: 5 (a) The operator shall submit written notice to the department at 6 least ninety days prior to the anticipated date of closure of the nurs- 7 ing home. 8 (b) The written notice shall include a proposed plan for closure of 9 the nursing home. The plan shall be subject to approval by the commis- 10 sioner, and shall include timetables for all steps in the closure proc- 11 ess and descriptions of the procedures and actions the operator will 12 take to: 13 (i) notify residents of the closure, including provisions for termi- 14 nation of admission agreements and involuntary discharge; 15 (ii) assess the needs and preferences of individual residents; 16 (iii) assist residents in locating and transferring to appropriate 17 alternative settings; and 18 (iv) maintain compliance with the provisions of this section and other 19 applicable laws and regulations until all residents have relocated. 20 (c) Copies of the written notice shall be concurrently delivered to: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08071-02-6 S. 4275--A 2 1 (i) the chief executive officer and the presiding officer of the local 2 legislative body of each county, city, town or village in which the 3 nursing home is located, except a county wholly contained within a city; 4 (ii) the nursing home's residents' council; and 5 (iii) in a city with a population of one million or more people, the 6 community board in whose district the nursing home is located. Copies 7 of the written notice shall also be made available to the public on the 8 department's website, and the facility's website if it otherwise main- 9 tains a website. 10 (d) Such officer, legislative body or board may: 11 (i) convene closed or public meetings, upon notice to the department 12 and the nursing home operator, that must conclude within forty-five days 13 of the operator's proposed notice of closure; 14 (ii) examine any information relevant to needs of the community and 15 the impact of the closure on stakeholders; and 16 (iii) make a non-binding recommendation to the commissioner as to 17 whether the application for closure should be approved, modified or 18 rejected. 19 2. (a) The operator shall take no action to close the nursing home 20 prior to approval by the commissioner of the plan for closure. 21 (b) The operator shall not close the nursing home until all residents 22 of the nursing home have transferred to appropriate alternative 23 settings. 24 (c) The operator shall not increase the amount of any fees or charges 25 or institute any new fees or charges payable by the residents of the 26 nursing home, their families or their insurance companies, if any, prior 27 to approval of the plan for closure. 28 (d) The operator shall not accept new residents, admissions, or trans- 29 fers for the nursing home, after the operator has submitted written 30 notice to the department that the operator intends to close the nursing 31 home, unless (i) each such new resident, admission or transfer is noti- 32 fied prior to acceptance of the intended date of closure, or (ii) the 33 operator's election to close the nursing home has been abandoned. 34 3. The commissioner may approve, modify or reject the proposed plan 35 for closure and may impose conditions on any approval. An approved plan 36 for closure shall: 37 (a) specify any modifications the department requires to the proposed 38 plan for closure; 39 (b) provide for the maintenance, storage, safekeeping, and ultimate 40 disposition of patient medical records and provide for transfer of or 41 access to such records to the patients, their treating health care 42 providers, or lawful representatives; and 43 (c) include a plan to ensure that arrangements will be made for 44 continued care that meets each resident's social, emotional and health 45 needs. 46 4. The department shall make a full copy of an approved closure plan 47 available to the public on the department's website and shall update the 48 posting should the plans change. 49 5. Failure of a nursing home operator to comply with any provision of 50 this section or the terms of any agreement with or conditions imposed by 51 the commissioner under this section shall result in the imposition of 52 penalties under this chapter. 53 6. Nothing in this section shall prevent the commissioner from order- 54 ing or expediting temporary or permanent closure of a nursing home if 55 the commissioner deems such closure necessary to protect the health and 56 safety of the residents due to the operator's financial distress, S. 4275--A 3 1 mismanagement, or malfeasance, or other factors that cause the operator 2 to be unable to safely operate the nursing home. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 4 become a law, and shall apply to all closures of nursing homes occurring 5 ninety days or more after such effective date. Effective immediately, 6 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 7 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 8 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.